Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1903
Packet; development; distribution; private financial assistance.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall assist the State Department of Education in developing the packet and shall develop methods of distributing the packet to parents upon the birth of a child in this state beginning on January 1, 2003.

(2) The departments shall solicit private financial assistance to carry out their duties under the Nebraska Read, Educate, and Develop Youth Act. The departments shall not endorse any private company or product, but private companies may have their names placed on materials in the packet to help underwrite the costs of developing and distributing the packets.

Laws 2002, LB 326, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 715.